Illinois, session 104th, SB972.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Coverage Disclosure Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 46/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Consumer Coverage Disclosure Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-630, eff. 8-27-21.)